Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201454-637
Information on
spaying and neutering; requirements.

(1) Every
dealer, commercial dog or cat breeder,
animal shelter, animal rescue, animal control facility, or pet shop or any
other retailer, who transfers ownership of a dog or cat to an ultimate consumer,
shall deliver to the ultimate consumer of each dog or cat at the time of sale,
written material, in a form determined by such seller, containing information
on the benefits of spaying and neutering. The written material shall include
recommendations on establishing a relationship with a veterinarian, information
on early-age spaying and neutering, the health benefits associated with spaying
and neutering pets, the importance of minimizing the risk of homeless or unwanted
animals, and the need to comply with applicable license laws.

(2) The delivering of any model materials prepared by the
Pet Industry Joint Advisory Council or the Nebraska Humane Society shall satisfy
the requirements of subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 2003, LB 274, § 4;

Laws 2010, LB910, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB427, § 5.